Utah statutes.
38-3-1.   Lien for rent due.
Except as hereinafter provided, lessors shall have a lien for rent due upon
all nonexempt property of the lessee brought or kept upon the leased premises
so long as the lessee shall occupy said premises and for thirty days
thereafter.
